Oklahoma, session 2026, SB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1273.1 of Title 21, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. It shall be unlawful for a person to store or leave a


firearm in a manner which allows a minor to have unsupervised access


to the firearm. A firearm that is not in use must be secured in a


locked container or by a device or mechanism, other than the firearm


safety, designed to render the firearm inaccessible or temporarily


inoperable.


B. A person who violates the provisions of subsection A of this


section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor,


punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not



Req. No. 277 Page 1


exceeding one (1) year, by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine.


C. A person who commits a violation of the provisions of


subsection A of this section which results in a minor accessing a


firearm and that results in bodily injury, great bodily injury, or


death to the minor or another person, shall, upon conviction, be


guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the


Department of Corrections for a term not less than two (2) years nor


more than twenty (20) years, by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand


Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-277 CN 12/30/2024 10:37:10 AM























Req. No. 277 Page 2